Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-413
Consolidated office; officer; bond; conditions; filing.

An officer of the consolidated counties shall file the same bond required of the same office in a county having a population equivalent to the population of the consolidated counties. Such bond shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county designated to make actual payment of his salary and approved by the board of such county. The fact of such filing and approval shall be certified to the county clerk of each of the other consolidated counties.

Laws 1969, c. 139, § 6, p. 640;

Laws 1971, LB 44, § 7.